Utah statutes.
17-41-406.   Restrictions on state development projects.
(1)  Each state agency that plans any development project that might affect
land within an agriculture protection area or industrial protection area shall
submit its development plan to:
(a)  the advisory board of the agriculture protection area or industrial
protection area, respectively; and
(b)  in the case of an agriculture protection area, the commissioner of
agriculture and food.
(2)  The commissioner of agriculture and food, in the case of an agriculture
protection area, and the advisory board shall:
(a)  review the state agency's proposed development plan; and
(b)  recommend any modifications to the development project that would protect
the integrity of the agriculture protection area or industrial protection
area, as the case may be, or that would protect the agriculture protection
area from nonfarm encroachment or the industrial protection area from
nonindustrial encroachment.
(3)  Each state agency and political subdivision of the state that designates
or proposes to designate a transportation corridor shall:
(a)  consider:
(i)  whether the transportation corridor would:
(A)  be located on land that is included within an agriculture protection
area; or
(B)  interfere with agriculture production activities on land within an
agriculture protection area; and
(ii)  each other reasonably comparable alternative to the placement of the
corridor on land within an agriculture protection area; and
(b)  make reasonable efforts to minimize or eliminate any detrimental impact
on agriculture that may result from the designation of a transportation
corridor.
